Nevada, session 83, AB102.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 439.410 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.410 1. The district board of health has the powers, duties
and authority of a county board of health in the health district.
2. The district health department has jurisdiction over all public
health matters in the health district, except in matters concerning
emergency medical services pursuant to the provisions of chapter
450B of NRS.
3. In addition to any other powers, duties and authority
conferred on a district board of health by this section [, the] :
(a) The district board of health may by affirmative vote of a
majority of all the members of the board adopt regulations
consistent with law, which must take effect immediately on their
approval by the State Board of Health, to:
[(a)] (1) Prevent and control nuisances;
[(b)] (2) Regulate sanitation and sanitary practices in the
interests of the public health;
[(c)] (3) Provide for the sanitary protection of water and food
supplies; and
[(d)] (4) Protect and promote the public health generally in the
geographical area subject to the jurisdiction of the health district.
(b) The district board of health in a health district that
includes a county whose population is 100,000 or more but less
than 700,000 may, by affirmative vote of a majority of all the
members of the board, elect to regulate emergency medical
services within the district pursuant to chapter 450B of NRS.
4. Before the adoption, amendment or repeal of a regulation,
the district board of health must give at least 30 days’ notice of its
intended action. The notice must:
(a) Include a statement of either the terms or substance of the
proposal or a description of the subjects and issues involved, and of
the time when, the place where and the manner in which interested
persons may present their views thereon.
(b) State each address at which the text of the proposal may be
inspected and copied.
(c) Be mailed to all persons who have requested in writing that
they be placed on a mailing list, which must be kept by the district
board for such purpose.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
5. All interested persons must be afforded a reasonable
opportunity to submit data, views or arguments, orally or in writing,
on the intended action to adopt, amend or repeal the regulation.
With respect to substantive regulations, the district board shall set a
time and place for an oral public hearing, but if no one appears who
will be directly affected by the proposal and requests an oral
hearing, the district board may proceed immediately to act upon any
written submissions. The district board shall consider fully all
written and oral submissions respecting the proposal.
6. Each district board of health shall file a copy of all of its
adopted regulations with the county clerk of each county in which it
has jurisdiction.
Sec. 2. Chapter 450B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
“Regulating health district” means a health district:
1. In a county whose population is 700,000 or more; or
2. For which the district board of health has elected to
regulate emergency medical services pursuant to NRS 439.410.
Sec. 3. NRS 450B.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.020 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 450B.025 to
450B.110, inclusive, and section 2 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 4. NRS 450B.060 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.060 “Board” means:
1. [In a county whose population is less than 700,000, the State
Board of Health.
2.] In a [county whose population is 700,000 or more,]
regulating health district, the district board of health.
2. In an area not described in subsection 1, the State Board of
Health.
Sec. 5. NRS 450B.077 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.077 “Health authority” means:
1. [In a county whose population is less than 700,000, the
Division.
2.] In a [county whose population is 700,000 or more,]
regulating health district, the district board of health.
2. In an area not described in subsection 1, the Division.
Sec. 6. NRS 450B.082 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.082 “Health officer” means:
1. In a [county whose population is less than 700,000, the
Chief Medical Officer.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
2. In a county whose population is 700,000 or more,]
regulating health district, the district health officer.
2. In an area not described in subsection 1, the Chief Medical
Officer.
Sec. 7. NRS 450B.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.160 1. The health authority may issue licenses to
attendants and to firefighters employed by or serving as volunteers
with a fire-fighting agency. A person is eligible for a license as an
attendant if he or she:
(a) Is at least 16 years of age; and
(b) Possesses the qualifications required by this section and
any regulations adopted by the board.
2. Each license must be evidenced by a card issued to the
holder of the license, is valid for a period not to exceed 2 years and
is renewable.
3. An applicant for a license must file with the health authority:
(a) A current, valid certificate evidencing the applicant’s
successful completion of a program of training as an emergency
medical technician, advanced emergency medical technician or
paramedic, if the applicant is applying for a license as an attendant,
or, if a volunteer attendant, at a level of skill determined by the
board.
(b) A current valid certificate evidencing the applicant’s
successful completion of a program of training as an emergency
medical technician, advanced emergency medical technician or
paramedic, if the applicant is applying for a license as a firefighter
with a fire-fighting agency.
(c) A signed statement showing:
(1) The name and address of the applicant;
(2) The name and address of the employer of the applicant;
and
(3) A description of the applicant’s duties.
(d) Proof that the applicant has completed the training required
by subsection 4.
(e) Such other certificates for training and such other items as
the board may specify.
4. In addition to the training required by subsection 3, each
applicant for a license must complete training concerning
identifying and interacting with persons with developmental
disabilities.
5. The board shall adopt such regulations as it determines are
necessary for the issuance, suspension, revocation and renewal of
licenses.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
6. Each operator of an ambulance or air ambulance and each
fire-fighting agency shall annually file with the health authority a
complete list of the licensed persons in its service.
7. Licensed physicians, registered nurses and licensed
physician assistants may serve as attendants without being licensed
under the provisions of this section. A registered nurse who
performs emergency care in an ambulance or air ambulance shall
perform the care in accordance with the regulations of the State
Board of Nursing. A licensed physician assistant who performs
emergency care in an ambulance or air ambulance shall perform the
care in accordance with the regulations of the Board of Medical
Examiners.
8. Each licensed physician, registered nurse and licensed
physician assistant who serves as an attendant must have current
certification of completion of training in:
(a) Advanced life-support procedures for patients who require
cardiac care;
(b) Life-support procedures for pediatric patients who require
cardiac care; and
(c) Life-support procedures for patients with trauma that are
administered before the arrival of those patients at a hospital.
 The certification must be issued by the Board of Medical
Examiners for a physician or licensed physician assistant or by the
State Board of Nursing for a registered nurse.
9. The Board of Medical Examiners and the State Board of
Nursing shall issue a certificate pursuant to subsection 8 if the
licensed physician, licensed physician assistant or registered nurse
attends:
(a) A course offered by a national organization which is
nationally recognized for issuing such certification;
(b) Training conducted by the operator of an ambulance or air
ambulance; or
(c) Any other course or training,
 approved by the Board of Medical Examiners or the State Board
of Nursing, whichever is issuing the certification.
10. As used in this section, “developmental disability” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 435.007.
Sec. 8. NRS 450B.180 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.180 1. Any person desiring certification as an
emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical
technician or paramedic must apply to the health authority using
forms prescribed by the health authority. A person is eligible for
certification as an emergency medical technician if he or she is at
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
least 16 years of age and is otherwise qualified pursuant to this
chapter and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
2. The health authority, pursuant to regulations and procedures
adopted by the board, shall make a determination of the applicant’s
qualifications to be certified as an emergency medical technician,
advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic and shall
issue the appropriate certificate to each qualified applicant.
3. A certificate is valid for a period not exceeding 2 years and
may be renewed if the holder of the certificate complies with the
provisions of this chapter and meets the qualifications set forth in
the regulations and standards established by the board pursuant to
this chapter. The regulations and standards established by the board
must provide for the completion of:
(a) A course of instruction, within 2 years after initial
certification, relating to the medical consequences of an act of
terrorism that involves the use of a weapon of mass destruction. The
course must provide at least 4 hours of instruction that includes
instruction in the following subjects:
(1) An overview of acts of terrorism and weapons of mass
destruction;
(2) Personal protective equipment required for acts of
terrorism;
(3) Common symptoms and methods of treatment associated
with exposure to, or injuries caused by, chemical, biological,
radioactive and nuclear agents;
(4) Syndromic surveillance and reporting procedures for acts
of terrorism that involve biological agents; and
(5) An overview of the information available on, and the use
of, the Health Alert Network.
 The board may thereafter determine whether to establish
regulations and standards requiring additional courses of instruction
relating to the medical consequences of an act of terrorism that
involves the use of a weapon of mass destruction.
(b) Training before initial certification concerning identifying
and interacting with persons with developmental disabilities.
Training completed pursuant to this paragraph also satisfies the
requirement for such training prescribed by NRS 289.605 or
450B.160, if applicable.
4. The health authority may suspend or revoke a certificate if it
finds that the holder of the certificate no longer meets the prescribed
qualifications. Unless the certificate is suspended by the district
court pursuant to NRS 425.540, the holder of the certificate may
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
appeal the suspension or revocation of his or her certificate pursuant
to regulations adopted by the board.
5. The board shall determine the procedures and techniques
which may be performed by an emergency medical technician,
advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic.
6. A certificate issued pursuant to this section is valid
throughout the State, whether issued by the Division or a district
board of health.
7. The Division shall maintain a central registry of all
certificates issued pursuant to this section, whether issued by the
Division or a district board of health.
8. The board shall adopt such regulations as are necessary to
carry out the provisions of this section.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Act of terrorism” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 202.4415.
(b) “Biological agent” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 202.442.
(c) “Chemical agent” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 202.4425.
(d) “Developmental disability” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 435.007.
(e) “Radioactive agent” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 202.4437.
(f) “Weapon of mass destruction” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 202.4445.
Sec. 9. NRS 450B.1975 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.1975 1. An advanced emergency medical technician or
a paramedic who holds an endorsement to administer
immunizations, dispense medication and prepare and respond to
certain public health needs issued in accordance with the regulations
adopted pursuant to this section may:
(a) Administer immunizations and dispense medications;
(b) Participate in activities designed to prepare the community
to meet anticipated health needs, including, without limitation,
participation in public vaccination clinics; and
(c) Respond to an actual epidemic or other emergency in the
community,
 under the direct supervision of the local health officer, or a
designee of the local health officer, of the jurisdiction in which the
immunization is administered or the medication is dispensed or in
which the emergency or need exists.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
2. The district board of health [,] in a [county whose population
is 700,000 or more,] regulating health district may adopt
regulations for the endorsement of advanced emergency medical
technicians and paramedics pursuant to this section. The regulations
must:
(a) Prescribe the minimum training required to obtain such an
endorsement;
(b) Prescribe the continuing education requirements or other
evidence of continued competency for renewal of the endorsement;
(c) Prescribe the fee for the issuance and renewal of the
endorsement, which must not exceed $5; and
(d) Not require licensure as an attendant as a condition of
eligibility for an endorsement pursuant to this section.
3. The State Board of Health shall, for counties [whose
population is less than 700,000,] that are not part of a regulating
health district, adopt regulations for the endorsement of advanced
emergency medical technicians and paramedics pursuant to this
section. The regulations must:
(a) Prescribe the minimum training required to obtain such an
endorsement;
(b) Prescribe the continuing education requirements or other
evidence of continued competency for renewal of the endorsement;
(c) Prescribe the fee for the issuance and renewal of the
endorsement, which must not exceed $5;
(d) To the extent practicable, authorize local health officers to
provide the training and continuing education required to obtain and
renew an endorsement; and
(e) Not require licensure as an attendant as a condition of
eligibility for an endorsement pursuant to this section.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Emergency” means an occurrence or threatened occurrence
for which, in the determination of the Governor, the assistance of
state agencies is needed to supplement the efforts and capabilities of
political subdivisions to save lives, protect property and protect the
health and safety of persons in this State, or to avert the threat of
damage to property or injury to or the death of persons in this State.
(b) “Local health officer” means a city health officer appointed
pursuant to NRS 439.430, county health officer appointed pursuant
to NRS 439.290 or district health officer appointed pursuant to NRS
439.368 or 439.400.
Sec. 10. NRS 450B.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.200 1. The health authority may issue a permit for:
(a) The operation of an ambulance or an air ambulance; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
(b) The operation of a vehicle of a fire-fighting agency:
(1) At the scene of an emergency; and
(2) To provide community paramedicine services, but only if
the holder of the permit has obtained an endorsement on the permit
to provide such services pursuant to NRS 450B.1993.
2. Each permit must be evidenced by a card issued to the
holder of the permit.
3. No permit may be issued unless the applicant is qualified
pursuant to the regulations of the board.
4. An application for a permit must be made upon forms
prescribed by the board and in accordance with procedures
established by the board, and must contain the following:
(a) The name and address of the owner of the ambulance or air
ambulance or of the fire-fighting agency;
(b) The name under which the applicant is doing business or
proposes to do business, if applicable;
(c) A description of each ambulance, air ambulance or vehicle of
a fire-fighting agency, including the make, year of manufacture and
chassis number, and the color scheme, insigne, name, monogram or
other distinguishing characteristics to be used to designate the
applicant’s ambulance, air ambulance or vehicle;
(d) The location and description of the places from which the
ambulance, air ambulance or fire-fighting agency intends to operate;
and
(e) Such other information as the board deems reasonable and
necessary to a fair determination of compliance with the provisions
of this chapter.
5. The board shall establish a reasonable fee for annual
permits. Revenue from such fees collected by the Division must be
accounted for separately and does not revert to the State General
Fund at the end of any fiscal year.
6. All permits expire on July 1 following the date of issue, and
are renewable annually thereafter upon payment of the fee required
by subsection 5 at least 30 days before the expiration date.
7. The health authority shall:
(a) Revoke, suspend or refuse to renew any permit issued
pursuant to this section for violation of any provision of this chapter
or of any regulation adopted by the board; or
(b) Bring an action in any court for violation of this chapter or
the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter,
 only after the holder of a permit is afforded an opportunity for a
public hearing pursuant to regulations adopted by the board.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
8. The health authority may suspend a permit if the holder is
using an ambulance, air ambulance or vehicle of a fire-fighting
agency which does not meet the minimum requirements for
equipment as established by the board pursuant to this chapter.
9. In determining whether to issue a permit for the operation of
an air ambulance pursuant to this section, the health authority:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), may consider
the medical aspects of the operation of an air ambulance, including,
without limitation, aspects related to patient care; and
(b) Shall not consider economic factors, including, without
limitation, factors related to the prices, routes or nonmedical
services of an air ambulance.
10. The issuance of a permit pursuant to this section or NRS
450B.210 does not authorize any person or governmental entity to
provide those services or to operate any ambulance, air ambulance
or vehicle of a fire-fighting agency not in conformity with any
ordinance or regulation enacted by any county, municipality or
special purpose district.
11. A permit issued pursuant to this section is valid throughout
the State, whether issued by the Division or a district board of
health. An ambulance, air ambulance or vehicle of a fire-fighting
agency which has received a permit from the district board of health
in a [county whose population is 700,000 or more] regulating
health district is not required to obtain a permit from the Division,
even if the ambulance, air ambulance or vehicle of a fire-fighting
agency has routine operations outside the county.
12. The Division shall maintain a central registry of all permits
issued pursuant to this section, whether issued by the Division or a
district board of health.
13. The board shall adopt such regulations as are necessary to
carry out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 10.5. NRS 450B.237 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
450B.237 1. The district board of health in a county whose
population is 700,000 or more or the State Board of Health, in all
other counties, shall establish a program for treating persons who
require treatment for trauma and for transporting and admitting such
persons to centers for the treatment of trauma. The program must
provide for the development, operation and maintenance of a system
of communication to be used in transporting such persons to the
appropriate centers.
2. The State Board of Health shall adopt regulations which
establish the standards for the designation of hospitals as centers for
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
the treatment of trauma. The State Board of Health shall consider
the standards adopted by the American College of Surgeons for a
center for the treatment of trauma as a guide for such regulations.
The Administrator of the Division shall not approve a proposal to
designate a hospital as a center for the treatment of trauma unless:
(a) The hospital meets the standards established pursuant to this
subsection; and
(b) The Administrator determines, after conducting a
comprehensive assessment of needs, that the proposed center for the
treatment of trauma will operate in an area that is experiencing a
shortage of trauma care. Such an assessment of needs must include,
without limitation, consideration of:
(1) The impact of the proposed center for the treatment of
trauma on the capacity of existing hospitals to provide for the
treatment of trauma;
(2) The number and locations of cases of trauma that have
occurred during the previous 5 calendar years in the county in which
the proposed center for the treatment of trauma will be located and
the level of treatment that was required for those cases;
(3) Any identified need for an additional center for the
treatment of trauma in the county in which the proposed center for
the treatment of trauma will be located; and
(4) Any additional criteria recommended by the American
College of Surgeons or its successor organization, other than criteria
related to community support for the proposed trauma center.
3. Each district board of health in a county whose population is
700,000 or more shall adopt:
(a) Regulations which establish the standards for the designation
of hospitals in the county as centers for the treatment of trauma
which are consistent with the regulations adopted by the State Board
of Health pursuant to subsection 2; and
(b) A plan for a comprehensive trauma system concerning the
treatment of trauma in the county, which includes, without
limitation, consideration of the future trauma needs of the county,
consideration of and plans for the development and designation of
new centers for the treatment of trauma in the county based on the
demographics of the county and the manner in which the county
may most effectively provide trauma services to persons in the
county.
4. A district board of health in a county whose population is
700,000 or more shall not approve a proposal to designate a hospital
as a center for the treatment of trauma unless:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
(a) The hospital meets the standards established pursuant to
subsection 3;
(b) The proposal has been approved by the Administrator of the
Division pursuant to subsection 2; and
(c) The district board of health concludes, based on the plan
adopted pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 3, that the proposed
center for the treatment of trauma will not negatively impact the
capacity of existing centers for the treatment of trauma in the
county.
5. Upon approval by the Administrator of the Division and, if
the hospital is located in a county whose population is 700,000 or
more, the district board of health of the county in which the hospital
is located, of a proposal to designate a hospital as a center for the
treatment of trauma, the Administrator of the Division shall issue
written approval which designates the hospital as such a center. As a
condition of continuing designation of the hospital as a center for
the treatment of trauma, the hospital must comply with the
following requirements:
(a) The hospital must admit any injured person who requires
medical care.
(b) Any physician who provides treatment for trauma must be
qualified to provide that treatment.
(c) The hospital must maintain the standards specified in the
regulations adopted pursuant to subsections 2 and 3.
Sec. 11. NRS 450B.260 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.260 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section or
as authorized by the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services
Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact ratified by NRS 450B.145,
the public or private owner of an ambulance or air ambulance or a
fire-fighting agency which owns a vehicle used in providing medical
care to sick or injured persons at the scene of an emergency or while
transporting those persons to a medical facility shall not permit its
operation and use by any person not licensed under this chapter.
2. An ambulance carrying a sick or injured patient must be
occupied by a driver and an attendant, each of whom is licensed as
an attendant pursuant to this chapter, exempt from licensing
pursuant to subsection 7 of NRS 450B.160 or authorized to practice
in this State under the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services
Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact ratified by NRS 450B.145,
except as otherwise provided in subsection 5 or in geographic areas
which may be designated by the board and for which the board may
prescribe lesser qualifications.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
3. An air ambulance carrying a sick or injured patient must be
occupied by a licensed attendant, a person exempt from licensing
pursuant to subsection 7 of NRS 450B.160 or a person authorized to
practice in this State under the Recognition of Emergency Medical
Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact ratified by NRS
450B.145, in addition to the pilot of the aircraft.
4. The pilot of an air ambulance is not required to have a
license under this chapter.
5. A person who operates or uses a vehicle owned by a fire-
fighting agency is not required to be licensed under this chapter,
except that such a vehicle may not be used to provide the level of
medical care provided by an advanced emergency medical
technician or paramedic to sick or injured persons:
(a) At the scene of an emergency unless at least one person in
the vehicle is licensed to provide the care; or
(b) While transporting those persons to a medical facility unless
at least two persons in the vehicle are licensed to provide the care.
6. The board may not require that a person who is
participating in a program of training for certification as an
emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical
technician or paramedic be licensed as an attendant pursuant to
this chapter in order to occupy an ambulance that is being used to
provide medical care to sick or injured persons at the scene of an
emergency or while transporting a sick or injured person so long
as:
(a) The ambulance is otherwise staffed in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter and any regulations adopted pursuant
thereto; and
(b) The unlicensed person does not provide care to a sick or
injured person or drive the ambulance.
7. Nothing in this section precludes the operation of an aircraft
in this State in a manner other than as an air ambulance.
Sec. 12. 1. Any regulations adopted by a board that conflict
with the amendatory provisions of this act are void. The Legislative
Counsel shall remove those regulations from the Nevada
Administrative Code as soon as practicable after July 1, 2025.
2. As used in this section, “board” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 450B.060, as amended by section 4 of this act.
Sec. 13. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)